trunk/apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix
<pardef n="d/ur__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>uríem</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uria</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uríeu</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uries</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>urien</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uria</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>urem</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uré</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ureu</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uràs</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uran</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>urà</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

<!-- futur del subjuntiu ????
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
	<l>uguéssim</l> 
	<r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
	<l>ugués</l> 
	<r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
	<l>uguéssiu</l> 
	<r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
	<l>uguessis</l> 
	<r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
	<l>uguessin</l> 
	<r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
	<l>ugués</l> 
	<r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
-->

  <e>       <p><l>uent</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uent</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uguérem</l>   <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uguí</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uguéreu</l>   <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ugueres</l>   <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ugueren</l>   <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ugué</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uguem</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uguem</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ueu</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ueu</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uu</l>        <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l>        <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uus</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uu</l>        <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uguin</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uguen</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uguin</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uguen</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ugui</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uga</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ugui</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uga</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uia</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uies</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uien</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uia</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uguéssim</l>  <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uguérem</l>   <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ugués</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uguera</l>    <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uguéssiu</l>  <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uguéreu</l>   <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uguessis</l>  <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ugueres</l>   <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uguessin</l>  <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ugueren</l>   <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ugués</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uguera</l>    <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>utes</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uta</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uts</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ut</l>        <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uem</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uc</l>        <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ueu</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uus</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l>        <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uen</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uu</l>        <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uguem</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ugui</l>      <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>uga</l>       <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ugueu</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>uguis</l>     <r>ur<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="dur">             <i>d</i><par n="d/ur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dur a terme">     <i>d</i><par n="d/ur__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>terme</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>terme</g></r></p></e>
